Tennessee, session 114, HB1803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-101, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(13) and (a)(14) and substituting instead:
(13) "Manufacture" means:
(A) Brewing high alcohol content beer;
(B) Distilling distilled spirits;
(C) Rectifying distilled spirits;
(D) Bottling distilled spirits; or
(E) Operating a winery;
(14) "Manufacturer" means:
(A) A brewer of high alcohol content beer;
(B) A distiller;
(C) A rectifier;
(D) A bottler of distilled spirits; or
(E) A vintner;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1803
011563
- 1 -